Missouri, session 2026, HB2094.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.901, to read as follows:
227.901. The portion of U.S. Highway 24 from Davis Road continuing east to
2 Ferguson Spring Road in Jackson County shall be designated the "WWII Robert Earl
3 Sauls Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain
4 appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by the
5 department.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.